apertium-id-ms.ms.dix
    <pardef n="penertawaan-penertawaannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penertawaan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penertawaannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembelajar-pembelajar__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="ber"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembelajar-pembelajarnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="ber"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembelajar__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembelajarnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemeraga-pemeraga__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="per"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemeraga-pemeraganya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="per"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemeraga__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemeraganya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pengusaha-pengusaha__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pengusaha-pengusahanya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penyearah-penyearah__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="se"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penyearah-penyearahnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="se"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penyearah__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="se"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penyearahnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="se"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pengusaha__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pengusahanya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perbahasaan-perbahasaan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perbahasaan-perbahasaannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perbahasaan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perbahasaannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pelajar-pelajar__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pelajar-pelajarnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pelajar__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pelajarnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kata-kata__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kata-katanya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="akhiran-akhiran__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="san"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="akhiran-akhirannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="san"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="akhiran__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="san"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="akhirannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="san"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kata__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="katanya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Maria__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Indonesia__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Yakobus__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dua__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berdua__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="coll"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kedua__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keduanya__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adalah__part">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="part"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dari__pr">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="pr"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ini__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berapa__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sana__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kami__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="saya__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="France"><i>France</i><par n="Indonesia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="New York"><i>New<b/>York</i><par n="Indonesia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Maria"><i>Maria</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mary"><i>Mary</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lee Kuan Yew"><i>Lee<b/>Kuan<b/>Yew</i><par n="Yakobus__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Santa Klaus"><i>Santa<b/>Klaus</i><par n="Yakobus__np"/></e>
    <e lm="adalah"><i>adalah</i><par n="adalah__part"/></e>
    <e lm="ialah"><i>ialah</i><par n="adalah__part"/></e>
    <e lm="jawat"><p><l>jawatan-jawatan</l><r>jawat</r></p><par n="akhiran-akhiran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rancang"><p><l>rancangan-rancangan</l><r>rancang</r></p><par n="akhiran-akhiran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jurus"><p><l>jurusan</l><r>jurus</r></p><par n="akhiran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ruang"><p><l>ruangan</l><r>ruang</r></p><par n="akhiran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hari"><p><l>hariannya</l><r>hari</r></p><par n="akhirannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pasang"><p><l>pasangannya</l><r>pasang</r></p><par n="akhirannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="berapakah"><i>berapakah</i><par n="berapa__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="siapakah"><i>siapakah</i><par n="berapa__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="lima"><p><l>berlima</l><r>lima</r></p><par n="berdua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tujuh"><p><l>bertujuh</l><r>tujuh</r></p><par n="berdua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="oleh kerana"><i>oleh<b/>kerana</i><par n="dari__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="untuk"><i>untuk</i><par n="dari__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="perlima"><i>perlima</i><par n="dua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="seperlima"><i>seperlima</i><par n="dua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ini"><i>ini</i><par n="ini__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="itu"><i>itu</i><par n="ini__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kami"><i>kami</i><par n="kami__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kita"><i>kita</i><par n="kami__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="gula"><p><l>gula-gula</l><r>gula</r></p><par n="kata-kata__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mesyuarat"><p><l>mesyuarat-mesyuarat</l><r>mesyuarat</r></p><par n="kata-kata__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kawan"><i>kawan</i><par n="kata__n"/></e>
    <e lm="psikiatri"><i>psikiatri</i><par n="kata__n"/></e>
    <e lm="empayar"><p><l>empayarnya</l><r>empayar</r></p><par n="katanya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nanti"><p><l>nantinya</l><r>nanti</r></p><par n="katanya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lima"><p><l>kelima</l><r>lima</r></p><par n="kedua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sepuluh"><p><l>kesepuluh</l><r>sepuluh</r></p><par n="kedua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ajar"><p><l>pelajar-pelajar</l><r>ajar</r></p><par n="pelajar-pelajar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kerja"><p><l>pekerja-pekerja</l><r>kerja</r></p><par n="pelajar-pelajar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rangsang"><p><l>perangsang</l><r>rangsang</r></p><par n="pelajar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rokok"><p><l>perokok</l><r>rokok</r></p><par n="pelajar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ajar"><p><l>pelajarnya</l><r>ajar</r></p><par n="pelajarnya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kerja"><p><l>pekerjanya</l><r>kerja</r></p><par n="pelajarnya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="guna"><p><l>pengguna-pengguna</l><r>guna</r></p><par n="pengusaha-pengusaha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sokong"><p><l>penyokong-penyokong</l><r>sokong</r></p><par n="pengusaha-pengusaha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hujung"><p><l>penghujung</l><r>hujung</r></p><par n="pengusaha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sepit"><p><l>penyepit</l><r>sepit</r></p><par n="pengusaha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ganti"><p><l>penggantinya</l><r>ganti</r></p><par n="pengusahanya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sokong"><p><l>penyokongnya</l><r>sokong</r></p><par n="pengusahanya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="soal"><p><l>persoalan-persoalan</l><r>soal</r></p><par n="perbahasaan-perbahasaan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tubuh"><p><l>pertubuhan-pertubuhan</l><r>tubuh</r></p><par n="perbahasaan-perbahasaan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="henti"><p><l>perhentian</l><r>henti</r></p><par n="perbahasaan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nikah"><p><l>pernikahan</l><r>nikah</r></p><par n="perbahasaan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lawan"><p><l>perlawanannya</l><r>lawan</r></p><par n="perbahasaannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rasa"><p><l>perasaannya</l><r>rasa</r></p><par n="perbahasaannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sini"><i>sini</i><par n="sana__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="situ"><i>situ</i><par n="sana__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="saya"><i>saya</i><par n="saya__prn"/></e>
